Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-237.01
Protected bird, defined.

Protected bird means all birds except game birds, English sparrows, European starlings, and pigeons other than Antwerp or homing pigeons, commonly called Carrier Pigeons.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 9.